data/grammar/fst/endings-generated.lexc
LEXICON TvEndingsGenerated
++junga+tv-ger-1s:junga # ;
++junga+tv-ger-1s:junga QParticles ;
++junga+tv-ger-1s:tunga # ;
++junga+tv-ger-1s:tunga QParticles ;
++junga+tv-ger-1s:KGUARDtunga # ;
++junga+tv-ger-1s:KGUARDtunga QParticles ;
++jutit+tv-ger-2s:jutit # ;
++jutit+tv-ger-2s:jutit QParticles ;
++jutit+tv-ger-2s:tutit # ;
++jutit+tv-ger-2s:tutit QParticles ;
++jutit+tv-ger-2s:KGUARDtutit # ;
++jutit+tv-ger-2s:KGUARDtutit QParticles ;
++juq+tv-ger-3s:juq # ;
++juq+tv-ger-3s:juq QParticles ;
++juq+tv-ger-3s:tuq # ;
++juq+tv-ger-3s:tuq QParticles ;
++juq+tv-ger-3s:KGUARDtuq # ;
++juq+tv-ger-3s:KGUARDtuq QParticles ;
++juguk+tv-ger-1d:juguk # ;
++juguk+tv-ger-1d:juguk QParticles ;
++juguk+tv-ger-1d:tuguk # ;
++juguk+tv-ger-1d:tuguk QParticles ;
++juguk+tv-ger-1d:KGUARDtuguk # ;
++juguk+tv-ger-1d:KGUARDtuguk QParticles ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:jusik # ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:jusik QParticles ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:jutik # ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:jutik QParticles ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:tusik # ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:tusik QParticles ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:KGUARDtusik # ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:KGUARDtusik QParticles ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:tutik # ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:tutik QParticles ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:KGUARDtutik # ;
++jusik+tv-ger-2d:KGUARDtutik QParticles ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:juuk # ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:juuk QParticles ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:juk # ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:juk QParticles ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:tuuk # ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:tuuk QParticles ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:KGUARDtuuk # ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:KGUARDtuuk QParticles ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:tuk # ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:tuk QParticles ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:KGUARDtuk # ;
++juuk+tv-ger-3d:KGUARDtuk QParticles ;
++jugut+tv-ger-1p:jugut # ;
++jugut+tv-ger-1p:jugut QParticles ;
++jugut+tv-ger-1p:tugut # ;
++jugut+tv-ger-1p:tugut QParticles ;
++jugut+tv-ger-1p:KGUARDtugut # ;
++jugut+tv-ger-1p:KGUARDtugut QParticles ;
++jusi+tv-ger-2p:jusi # ;
++jusi+tv-ger-2p:jusi QParticles ;
++jusi+tv-ger-2p:tusi # ;
++jusi+tv-ger-2p:tusi QParticles ;
++jusi+tv-ger-2p:KGUARDtusi # ;
++jusi+tv-ger-2p:KGUARDtusi QParticles ;
++jut+tv-ger-3p:jut # ;
++jut+tv-ger-3p:jut QParticles ;
++jut+tv-ger-3p:tut # ;
++jut+tv-ger-3p:tut QParticles ;
++jut+tv-ger-3p:KGUARDtut # ;
++jut+tv-ger-3p:KGUARDtut QParticles ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:vunga # ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:vunga QParticles ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:punga # ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:punga QParticles ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:VOICEqunga # ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:VOICEqunga QParticles ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:vutit # ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:vutit QParticles ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:putit # ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:putit QParticles ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:VOICEqutit # ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:VOICEqutit QParticles ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:vuq # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:vuq QParticles ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:puq # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:puq QParticles ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:VOICEquq # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:VOICEquq QParticles ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:vuguk # ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:vuguk QParticles ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:puguk # ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:puguk QParticles ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:VOICEquguk # ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:VOICEquguk QParticles ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:vusik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:vusik QParticles ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:vutik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:vutik QParticles ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:pusik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:pusik QParticles ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:putik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:putik QParticles ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:VOICEqusik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:VOICEqusik QParticles ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:VOICEqutik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:VOICEqutik QParticles ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:vuuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:vuuk QParticles ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:vuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:vuk QParticles ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puuk QParticles ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puk QParticles ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:VOICEquuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:VOICEquuk QParticles ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:VOICEquk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:VOICEquk QParticles ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:vugut # ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:vugut QParticles ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:pugut # ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:pugut QParticles ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:VOICEqugut # ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:VOICEqugut QParticles ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:vusi # ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:vusi QParticles ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:pusi # ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:pusi QParticles ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:VOICEqusi # ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:VOICEqusi QParticles ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:vut # ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:vut QParticles ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:put # ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:put QParticles ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:VOICEqut # ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:VOICEqut QParticles ;
++vunga+tv-int-1s:vunga # ;
++vunga+tv-int-1s:vunga QParticles ;
++vunga+tv-int-1s:punga # ;
++vunga+tv-int-1s:punga QParticles ;
++vunga+tv-int-1s:VOICEqunga # ;
++vunga+tv-int-1s:VOICEqunga QParticles ;
++vit+tv-int-2s:vit # ;
++vit+tv-int-2s:vit QParticles ;
++vit+tv-int-2s:pit # ;
++vit+tv-int-2s:pit QParticles ;
++vit+tv-int-2s:VOICEqit # ;
++vit+tv-int-2s:VOICEqit QParticles ;
++va+tv-int-3s:va # ;
++va+tv-int-3s:va QParticles ;
++va+tv-int-3s:pa # ;
++va+tv-int-3s:pa QParticles ;
++va+tv-int-3s:VOICEqa # ;
++va+tv-int-3s:VOICEqa QParticles ;
++vinuk+tv-int-1d:vinuk # ;
++vinuk+tv-int-1d:vinuk QParticles ;
++vinuk+tv-int-1d:pinuk # ;
++vinuk+tv-int-1d:pinuk QParticles ;
++vinuk+tv-int-1d:VOICEqinuk # ;
++vinuk+tv-int-1d:VOICEqinuk QParticles ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:visik # ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:visik QParticles ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:vitik # ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:vitik QParticles ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:pisik # ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:pisik QParticles ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:pitik # ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:pitik QParticles ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:VOICEqisik # ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:VOICEqisik QParticles ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:VOICEqitik # ;
++visik+tv-int-2d:VOICEqitik QParticles ;
++vak+tv-int-3d:vak # ;
++vak+tv-int-3d:vak QParticles ;
++vak+tv-int-3d:pak # ;
++vak+tv-int-3d:pak QParticles ;
++vak+tv-int-3d:VOICEqak # ;
++vak+tv-int-3d:VOICEqak QParticles ;
++vita+tv-int-1p:vita # ;
++vita+tv-int-1p:vita QParticles ;
++vita+tv-int-1p:pita # ;
++vita+tv-int-1p:pita QParticles ;
++vita+tv-int-1p:VOICEqita # ;
++vita+tv-int-1p:VOICEqita QParticles ;
++visi+tv-int-2p:visi # ;
++visi+tv-int-2p:visi QParticles ;
++visi+tv-int-2p:pisi # ;
++visi+tv-int-2p:pisi QParticles ;
++visi+tv-int-2p:VOICEqisi # ;
++visi+tv-int-2p:VOICEqisi QParticles ;
++vat+tv-int-3p:vat # ;
++vat+tv-int-3p:vat QParticles ;
++vat+tv-int-3p:pat # ;
++vat+tv-int-3p:pat QParticles ;
++vat+tv-int-3p:VOICEqat # ;
++vat+tv-int-3p:VOICEqat QParticles ;
++vinga+tv-int-2s-1s:vinga # ;
++vinga+tv-int-2s-1s:vinga QParticles ;
++vinga+tv-int-2s-1s:pinga # ;
++vinga+tv-int-2s-1s:pinga QParticles ;
++vaanga+tv-int-3s-1s:vaanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-int-3s-1s:vaanga QParticles ;
++vaanga+tv-int-3s-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-int-3s-1s:paanga QParticles ;
++vagit+tv-int-1s-2s:vagit # ;
++vagit+tv-int-1s-2s:vagit QParticles ;
++vagit+tv-int-1s-2s:pagit # ;
++vagit+tv-int-1s-2s:pagit QParticles ;
++vaatit+tv-int-3s-2s:vaatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-int-3s-2s:vaatit QParticles ;
++vaatit+tv-int-3s-2s:paatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-int-3s-2s:paatit QParticles ;
++vigu+tv-int-1s-3s:vigu # ;
++vigu+tv-int-1s-3s:vigu QParticles ;
++vigu+tv-int-1s-3s:pigu # ;
++vigu+tv-int-1s-3s:pigu QParticles ;
++viuk+tv-int-2s-3s:viuk # ;
++viuk+tv-int-2s-3s:viuk QParticles ;
++viuk+tv-int-2s-3s:piuk # ;
++viuk+tv-int-2s-3s:piuk QParticles ;
++vauk+tv-int-3s-3s:vauk # ;
++vauk+tv-int-3s-3s:vauk QParticles ;
++vauk+tv-int-3s-3s:pauk # ;
++vauk+tv-int-3s-3s:pauk QParticles ;
++langa+tv-imp-1s:langa # ;
++langa+tv-imp-1s:langa QParticles ;
++langa+tv-imp-1s:VOICElanga # ;
++langa+tv-imp-1s:VOICElanga QParticles ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:git # ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:git QParticles ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:tit # ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:tit QParticles ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:KGUARDtit # ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:KGUARDtit QParticles ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:SUPPRgit # ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:SUPPRgit QParticles ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:SUPPRrit # ;
++git+tv-imp-2s:SUPPRrit QParticles ;
++li+tv-imp-3s:li # ;
++li+tv-imp-3s:li QParticles ;
++li+tv-imp-3s:VOICEli # ;
++li+tv-imp-3s:VOICEli QParticles ;
++luk+tv-imp-1d:VOICEluk # ;
++luk+tv-imp-1d:VOICEluk QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:gissik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:gissik QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:gittik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:gittik QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:tissik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:tissik QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:KGUARDtissik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:KGUARDtissik QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:SUPPRgissik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:SUPPRgissik QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:tittik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:tittik QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:KGUARDtittik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:KGUARDtittik QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:SUPPRgittik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:SUPPRgittik QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:SUPPRrissik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:SUPPRrissik QParticles ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:SUPPRrittik # ;
++gissik+tv-imp-2d:SUPPRrittik QParticles ;
++lik+tv-imp-3d:lik # ;
++lik+tv-imp-3d:lik QParticles ;
++lik+tv-imp-3d:VOICElik # ;
++lik+tv-imp-3d:VOICElik QParticles ;
++ta+tv-imp-1p:ta # ;
++ta+tv-imp-1p:ta QParticles ;
++ta+tv-imp-1p:KGUARDta # ;
++ta+tv-imp-1p:KGUARDta QParticles ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:gipsi # ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:gipsi QParticles ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:tipsi # ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:tipsi QParticles ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:KGUARDtipsi # ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:KGUARDtipsi QParticles ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:SUPPRgipsi # ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:SUPPRgipsi QParticles ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:SUPPRripsi # ;
++gipsi+tv-imp-2p:SUPPRripsi QParticles ;
++lit+tv-imp-3p:lit # ;
++lit+tv-imp-3p:lit QParticles ;
++lit+tv-imp-3p:VOICElit # ;
++lit+tv-imp-3p:VOICElit QParticles ;
++vungaa+tv-int-1s:vungaa # ;
++vungaa+tv-int-1s:vungaa QParticles ;
++vungaa+tv-int-1s:pungaa # ;
++vungaa+tv-int-1s:pungaa QParticles ;
++vungaa+tv-int-1s:VOICEqungaa # ;
++vungaa+tv-int-1s:VOICEqungaa QParticles ;
++viit+tv-int-2s:viit # ;
++viit+tv-int-2s:viit QParticles ;
++viit+tv-int-2s:piit # ;
++viit+tv-int-2s:piit QParticles ;
++viit+tv-int-2s:VOICEqiit # ;
++viit+tv-int-2s:VOICEqiit QParticles ;
++vaa+tv-int-3s:vaa # ;
++vaa+tv-int-3s:vaa QParticles ;
++vaa+tv-int-3s:paa # ;
++vaa+tv-int-3s:paa QParticles ;
++vaa+tv-int-3s:VOICEqaa # ;
++vaa+tv-int-3s:VOICEqaa QParticles ;
++vinuuk+tv-int-1d:vinuuk # ;
++vinuuk+tv-int-1d:vinuuk QParticles ;
++vinuuk+tv-int-1d:pinuuk # ;
++vinuuk+tv-int-1d:pinuuk QParticles ;
++vinuuk+tv-int-1d:VOICEqinuuk # ;
++vinuuk+tv-int-1d:VOICEqinuuk QParticles ;
++visiik+tv-int-2d:pisiik # ;
++visiik+tv-int-2d:pisiik QParticles ;
++visiik+tv-int-2d:pitiik # ;
++visiik+tv-int-2d:pitiik QParticles ;
++visiik+tv-int-2d:VOICEqisiik # ;
++visiik+tv-int-2d:VOICEqisiik QParticles ;
++visiik+tv-int-2d:VOICEqitiik # ;
++visiik+tv-int-2d:VOICEqitiik QParticles ;
++vaak+tv-int-3d:paak # ;
++vaak+tv-int-3d:paak QParticles ;
++vaak+tv-int-3d:VOICEqaak # ;
++vaak+tv-int-3d:VOICEqaak QParticles ;
++vitaa+tv-int-1p:vitaa # ;
++vitaa+tv-int-1p:vitaa QParticles ;
++vitaa+tv-int-1p:pitaa # ;
++vitaa+tv-int-1p:pitaa QParticles ;
++vitaa+tv-int-1p:VOICEqitaa # ;
++vitaa+tv-int-1p:VOICEqitaa QParticles ;
++visii+tv-int-2p:visii # ;
++visii+tv-int-2p:visii QParticles ;
++visii+tv-int-2p:pisii # ;
++visii+tv-int-2p:pisii QParticles ;
++visii+tv-int-2p:VOICEqisii # ;
++visii+tv-int-2p:VOICEqisii QParticles ;
++vaat+tv-int-3p:vaat # ;
++vaat+tv-int-3p:vaat QParticles ;
++vaat+tv-int-3p:paat # ;
++vaat+tv-int-3p:paat QParticles ;
++vaat+tv-int-3p:VOICEqaat # ;
++vaat+tv-int-3p:VOICEqaat QParticles ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:varma # ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:varma QParticles ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:parma # ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:parma QParticles ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:VOICEqarma # ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:VOICEqarma QParticles ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:vaanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:vaanga QParticles ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:paanga QParticles ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:VOICEqaanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:VOICEqaanga QParticles ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:vagit # ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:vagit QParticles ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:pagit # ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:pagit QParticles ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:VOICEqagit # ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:VOICEqagit QParticles ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3s-2s:vaatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3s-2s:vaatit QParticles ;
